Hawaii statutes.
§636C-3 Filing and status of foreign
judgments. A copy of any exemplified foreign judgment may be filed in the
office of the clerk of the appropriate court of this State. The clerk shall
treat the foreign judgment in the same manner as a judgment of a court of this
State. A judgment so filed has the same effect and is subject to the same
procedures, defenses, and proceedings for reopening, vacating, or staying as a
judgment of a court of this State, including establishing a lien, and may be
enforced or satisfied in like manner. [L 1983, c 31, pt of §1; am L 1990, c
203, §6]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next